Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-713
Commissioner of Education; drug education; course on health education; prepare; distribute.

The Commissioner of Education shall prepare such teaching aids and materials as may be necessary for an effective course in comprehensive health education, which shall include drug education, for distribution to all public and private schools requesting such materials and approved for continued legal operation under rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Board of Education pursuant to subdivision (5)(c) of section 79-318.

Laws 1971, LB 51, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-1270.01;

Laws 1989, LB 15, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,140.18;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 387.